District of Columbia statutes.
22-2403

Subornation of perjury.

A person commits the offense of subornation of perjury if that person wilfully procures another to commit perjury. Any person convicted of subornation of perjury shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 10 years, or both.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 402, 29 DCR 3976
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 205(y), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 22-2512.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $5,000”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 205(y) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.